District of Columbia statutes.
16-708

Penalties for wrongful conversion of forfeitures and fines.

Whoever, being an agent as contemplated and defined by section 16-704(a) , or by section 16-707(a) , wrongfully converts to his own use any money received by him as provided therein, is guilty of theft, and shall be punished in the manner prescribed by law for such offense.

History

Dec. 23, 1963, 77 Stat. 559, Pub. L. 88-241, § 1
Dec. 1, 1982, D.C. Law 4-164, § 601(a), 29 DCR 3976

Cross References

Theft, see § 22-3211.

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 16-708.
1973 Ed., § 16-708.